District of Columbia statutes.
31-4728

Regulations.

The Mayor shall issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

June 19, 1934, ch. 672, ch. V, § 28
as added Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-160, § 3(h), 32 DCR 39
1981 Ed., § 35-534.